Massachusetts, session 194th, H4623.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 10H of Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the 
following paragraph:- 
"Section 10H. Subject to the availability of federal financial participation, the division 
shall cover medically necessary treatments for persons younger than 21 years old who are 
receiving medical coverage underthis chapter and who are diagnosed with an autism spectrum 
disorder by a licensed physician or a licensed psychologist. If federal funds are available to the 
commonwealth, said coverage shall include, but shall not be limited to, services for applied 
behavior analysis rendered by Behavior Technicians, Licensed Assistant Applied Behavior 
Analysts and Licensed Applied Behavior Analysts supervised by a licensed applied behavior 
analyst and dedicated and non-dedicated augmentative and alternative communication devices, 
including, but not limited to medically necessary tablets; provided, however, that the division 

of 2 13 shall also provide coverage for augmentative and alternative communication devices not eligible 
for federal funds if the total cost incurred by the division for a device that is not eligible for 
federal funds is not more than the commonwealth's share of a comparable device that is eligible 
for federal funds."